Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB981.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1105(a) and 1106(a) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1105. Standardized forms.(a) General rule.--Whenever possible, the secretary shall prescribe by regulation standardized voter registration or absentee ballot application forms which may be used, with prior approval by the secretary, by political bodies, candidates and organized bodies of citizens in compliance with both the provisions of this part and the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code. The forms shall include notice to applicants as required under section 12345678910111213141516171819 1327.1(d) (relating to government service facilitation).* * *§ 1106. Applications.[(a) Registration application.--Voter registration applications printed under the act of June 30, 1995 (P.L.170, No.25), known as the Pennsylvania Voter Registration Act, may be used to apply for registration under this part.]* * *Section 2. Section 1327(a)(4) of Title 25 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 1327. Preparation and distribution of applications.(a) Form.--* * *(4) A voter registration application shall be printed on stock of good quality and shall be of suitable uniform size. Nothing in this part shall prohibit the design and use of an electronic voter registration application which includes the applicant's digitized or electronic signature. The registration application shall contain the following information; however, the information may be provided on a separate form for voter registration made under section 1323 or 1325:* * *(xi) Notice to applicants as required under section 1327.1(d) (relating to government service facilitation).* * *Section 3. Title 25 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1327.1. Government service facilitation.(a) Duties of commission.--Notwithstanding any prohibition found in any other law, regulation or rule, a commission which 20250HB0981PN1071 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processes a voter registration application shall provide information as follows:(1) Within 30 days of receipt, the commission shall provide, in the manner prescribed by the secretary, the department with the applicant's full name, address of residence and, if different from the address of residence, mailing address. The requirements of this paragraph may be met, with the approval of the secretary, by current law and practices concerning transmission of information from a commission to the department.(2) Within 30 days of receipt, the commission shall provide, in the manner prescribed by the secretary, each political subdivision which contains the applicant's address of residence with the applicant's full name, address of residence and, if different from the address of residence, mailing address.(b) Duties of department.--Notwithstanding any prohibition found in any other law, regulation or rule, upon receipt of information from a commission under subsection (a), the department shall provide the Department of Revenue, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Transportation with the applicant's full name, address of residence and, if different from the address of residence, mailing address. The method of providing information shall be determined by the secretary in conjunction with the Department of Revenue, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Transportation, and may include email, facsimile or other secure method which accomplishes the requirements of this subsection without undue expense or delay.(c) Responsibility of recipient agencies.--Any State agency 20250HB0981PN1071 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or political subdivision which receives information regarding an applicant under subsection (a) or (b) shall determine if an applicant meets the residency requirements applicable to the services provided or duties imposed by that State agency or political subdivision and shall transmit to the applicant information concerning the rights and responsibilities of that applicant which fall within the scope of the authority provided to the State agency or political subdivision.(d) Notice on voter registration application.--Each voter registration application shall contain, in a manner prescribed by the secretary, notice that the applicant's name, address and mailing address will be provided to the Department of Transportation, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Revenue and relevant political subdivisions to ensure the applicant's full access to the rights and responsibilities attendant to residence.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Political subdivision." The term shall have the same meaning as the term is defined in 1 Pa.C.S. § 1991 (relating to definitions).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0981PN1071 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223